New York, session 2025-2026, A7349.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subject to the provisions of this act, the town of Niagara, 2 county of Niagara, is hereby authorized, acting by and through its 3 governing body, and upon such terms and conditions as determined by such 4 governing body, to discontinue the use as parkland and alienate the 5 lands described in section three of this act, and to sell and convey 6 property interests in such lands at fair market value to Rajendra Sharma 7 for the purpose of adding sufficient additional land to adjacent land 8 owned by Rajendra Sharma to construct a residence. 9 § 2. The authorization contained in section one of this act shall only 10 be effective on the condition that the town of Niagara dedicate an 11 amount equal to or greater than the fair market value of the parklands 12 being alienated pursuant to section one of this act towards the acquisi- 13 tion of new parklands and/or capital improvements to existing park and 14 recreational facilities. 15 § 3. The parkland authorized by section one of this act to be discon- 16 tinued as parkland is described as follows: 17 ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND situate in the Town of Niagara, Coun- 18 ty of Niagara and State of New York, being Part of Lot 11, Township 13, 19 Range 9 of the Holland Land Company's Survey, containing .15 acres more 20 or less, and further described as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10985-04-5 A. 7349--B 2 1 BEGINNING at a point on the north line of Joanne Circle North, former- 2 ly Joann Circle, (a 60.0 foot right of way) which point is the south- 3 easterly corner of Sublot 35 as shown on a map of Greenwood Acres, 4 Section No. 2 Part of Lot 11, Township 13, Range 9, Town and County of 5 Niagara, State of New York, made by henry R. Feldman and Associates, 6 Civil Engineers and Land Surveyors, dated October 17, 1968 and filed in 7 Niagara County Clerk's Office November 8, 1968 in Book 44 of Microfilmed 8 Maps at pages 4287 and 4288; thence easterly along the north line of 9 Joanne Circle North, a distance of 67.0 feet to a point; thence norther- 10 ly, at right angles to the north line of Joanne Circle North, a distance 11 of 97.31 feet to a point; thence westerly and parallel to the north line 12 of Joanne Circle North, a distance of 67.0 feet to a point which is the 13 northeast corner of said Sublot 35; thence southerly along the easterly 14 line of said Sublot 35, a distance of 97.31 feet to the north line of 15 Joanne Circle North at the point or place of beginning. 16 § 4. In the event that the town of Niagara received any funding 17 support or assistance from the federal government for the purchase, 18 maintenance, or improvement of the parklands set forth in section three 19 of this act, the discontinuance and alienation of such parklands author- 20 ized by the provisions of this act shall not occur until the town of 21 Niagara has complied with any federal requirements pertaining to the 22 alienation or conversion of parklands, including satisfying the secre- 23 tary of the interior that the alienation or conversion complies with all 24 conditions which the secretary of the interior deems necessary to assure 25 the substitution of other lands shall be equivalent in fair market value 26 and usefulness to the lands being alienated or converted. 27 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.